all_langs/src/morphology/stems/punctuation.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2020 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Punctuation symbols

LEXICON Punctuation   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains the list
!! of boundary symbols:
!! * Symbols like .,: are tagged with __+CLB__
!! * other symbols like +.& are tagged with __+PUNCT__, and 
!! * paired symbols like ()«» are tagged with __+PUNCT+LEFT__ 
!!   and __+PUNCT+RIGHT__, respectively.

!! * Clause boundary symbols:
    %,+CLB:%,     PunctEnd ;
    %.+CLB:%.     PunctEnd ;
  %.%.+CLB:%.%.   PunctEnd ;
%.%.%.+CLB:%.%.%. PunctEnd ;
    %:+CLB:%:     PunctEnd ;
    %;+CLB:%;     PunctEnd ;
    %!+CLB:%!     PunctEnd ;
    %|+CLB:%|     PunctEnd ;
    %?+CLB:%?     PunctEnd ; ! Question mark
     …+CLB:…      PunctEnd ;
     ¿+CLB:¿      PunctEnd ; ! Only seen as noise.
     ¶+CLB:¶      PunctEnd ; ! This sign is for titles, it is introduced by the
                             ! catxml script, and may be changed if it inter-
                             ! feres with real pilcrow signs.
     ❡+CLB:❡      PunctEnd ; ! This sign is for titles on html pages, added
                             ! when jorgal apertium download pages for MT
     ¬+CLB:¬      PunctEnd ;               
     ¥+CLB:¥      PunctEnd ;     !foreløpig          

!! * Single punctuation marks

  •+PUNCT:•   PunctEnd ;
  ●+PUNCT:●   PunctEnd ;
  ·+PUNCT:·   PunctEnd ;
!  ּ+PUNCT:ּ    PunctEnd ;
  ·+PUNCT:·   PunctEnd ;
  -+PUNCT:∑-   PunctEnd ; ! hyphen
 --+PUNCT:∑-∑- PunctEnd ; ! double hyphen
  –+PUNCT:–   PunctEnd ; ! endash
  —+PUNCT:—   PunctEnd ; ! emdash
  ―+PUNCT:―   PunctEnd ; ! horizontal bar
  −+PUNCT:−   PunctEnd ;
  _+PUNCT:_   PunctEnd ;
  =+PUNCT:=   PunctEnd ;
  ≈+PUNCT:≈   PunctEnd ;
  &+PUNCT:&   PunctEnd ;
 %"+PUNCT:%"  PunctEnd ;
  '+PUNCT:'   PunctEnd ; ! What about the CG symbol of ái'gi etc. in smX?
 %*+PUNCT:%*  PunctEnd ;
  ++PUNCT:+   PunctEnd ;
  ±+PUNCT:±   PunctEnd ;
  `+PUNCT:`   PunctEnd ;
  ´+PUNCT:´   PunctEnd ;
  /+PUNCT:/   PunctEnd ;
+/-+PUNCT:+/∑- PunctEnd ;
 %~+PUNCT:%~  PunctEnd ;
  ‐+PUNCT:‐   PunctEnd ;
  °+PUNCT:°   PunctEnd ;

!! * Paired punctuation marks

  «+PUNCT+LEFT:«7     PunctEnd ;
  »+PUNCT+RIGHT:»7    PunctEnd ;
 %“+PUNCT+LEFT:%“     PunctEnd ;
 %”+PUNCT+RIGHT:%”    PunctEnd ;
 %‘+PUNCT+LEFT:%‘     PunctEnd ;
 %’+PUNCT+RIGHT:%’    PunctEnd ;
 %„+PUNCT+LEFT:%„     PunctEnd ;
 %‹+PUNCT+LEFT:%‹     PunctEnd ;
 %›+PUNCT+RIGHT:%›    PunctEnd ;
 %(+PUNCT+LEFT:%(     PunctEnd ;
 %)+PUNCT+RIGHT:%)    PunctEnd ;
 %[+PUNCT+LEFT:%[     PunctEnd ;
 %]+PUNCT+RIGHT:%]    PunctEnd ;
 %{+PUNCT+LEFT:%{     PunctEnd ;
 %}+PUNCT+RIGHT:%}    PunctEnd ;
 %<+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%<%] PunctEnd ;
 %>+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%>%] PunctEnd ;


! Todo: Some symbols from non-ISO code pages do not work

!+PUNCT:"\150" PunctEnd ; ! trying to capture some hyphens
!+PUNCT:"\151" PunctEnd ; ! trying to capture some hyphens
! Did not work.

LEXICON PunctEnd   !!= * __@CODE@__ leads to # only.
    # ;
